Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1265
Application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 40.